Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.792

State student financial aid program—Guidelines to determine institutions affected by reciprocity agreements.

The office of student financial assistance shall develop guidelines for determining the conditions under which an institution can be determined to be directly affected by a reciprocity agreement for the purposes of RCW 28B.10.790: PROVIDED, That no institution shall be determined to be directly affected unless students from the county in which the institution is located are provided, pursuant to a reciprocity agreement, access to Washington institutions at resident tuition and fee rates to the extent authorized by Washington law.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 140; 1985 c 370 s 55; 1980 c 13 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Severability—1980 c 13: See note following RCW 28B.10.790.